Rhode Island, session 2025, HB5106.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Chapter 39-3 of the General Laws entitled "Regulatory Powers of
Administration" is hereby amended by adding thereto the following section:
39-3-45. Electric rates tied to the consumer price index.
(a) Notwithstanding any provisions of the general laws to the contrary, any increase in rates
proposed to be charged by an electric distribution company as defined in chapter 1 of this title, shall
be no greater than five and one-half percent (5.5%) or the percentage increase in the Consumer
Price Index for all Urban Consumers (CPI-U) as published by the United States Department of
Labor Bureau of Labor Statistics determined as of September 30 of the prior calendar year,
whichever is greater, unless the increase shall have been previously approved by affirmative action
of the general assembly.
(b) The provisions of this section shall not apply to any electric distribution company
having fewer than seven thousand five hundred (7,500) electricity customer accounts.
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC000093
========